Hawaii statutes.
§132-7 Duty of owner to remove fire hazard;
expense; lien. If the owner or occupant, to whom the order is directed,
fails to comply with the order, or with the order as modified on appeal, and
within the time therein fixed, then the county fire chief may cause the
buildings, structures, or premises to be repaired, torn down, demolished,
materials removed, and all dangerous conditions remedied, as the case may be,
at the expense of the owner or occupant, and, if the owner or occupant within
thirty days thereafter fails, neglects, or refuses to pay the county fire chief
the expense incurred thereby by the fire chief, the county shall have a prior
lien for the expense on the real estate on which the buildings or structures
were located, or on the premises involved, by the filing of a notice of lien in
the bureau of conveyances or in the office of the assistant registrar of the
land court, or both, as appropriate. [L 1917, c 115, pt of §49; RL 1925, pt of
§3463; RL 1935, pt of §6839; am L 1939, c 239, §1(12); RL 1945, §8532; RL 1955,
§184-8; HRS §132-8; am and ren L 1978, c 241, §2(8); gen ch 1985; am L 1998, c
219, §3]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next